New York, session 2025-2026, S10288.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 53 of the judiciary law, as 2 amended by chapter 450 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. The court shall prescribe rules providing for a uniform system of 5 examination of candidates for admission to practice as attorneys and 6 counsellors, which shall govern the state board of law examiners in the 7 performance of its duties. Such rules may require a candidate for admis- 8 sion to the bar to complete a certain number of hours of qualifying pro 9 bono service prior to filing an application for admission; provided, 10 however, that such qualifying pro bono service shall not include any 11 hours assisting in the provision of legal services required pursuant to 12 an agreement between the candidate for admission's supervisor or the 13 supervisor's law firm and the federal government under which the federal 14 government specifies the recipient or recipients or type or types or 15 nature of such legal services. The court shall not by its rules cause to 16 be barred from examination or, upon successful completion of the exam- 17 ination process, subsequent admission to the state bar, provided [he or 18 she] the candidate shall otherwise meet any requirements for admission, 19 any person who is currently admitted to practice in the jurisdiction of 20 another state and has received a degree from a law school which quali- 21 fies such person to practice law in such state, other than a law school 22 which grants credit for correspondence courses, provided that such 23 person has been engaged in the actual practice of law in the state in 24 which they are admitted for no less than five years. 25 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 468-a of the judiciary law, as added by 26 chapter 714 of the laws of 1981, is amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11929-10-6 S. 10288 2 1 3. The chief administrator shall prescribe the form in which such 2 registry of attorneys shall be maintained and the procedures for public 3 access thereto, and may make all such other rules and regulations neces- 4 sary and appropriate to implement and enforce the provisions of this 5 section. Such form may require an attorney to report the number of hours 6 of pro bono service completed by the attorney at the time the attorney 7 files a biennial registration statement; provided, however, that such 8 qualifying pro bono service shall not include any hours assisting in the 9 provision of legal services required pursuant to an agreement between an 10 attorney or the attorney's law firm and the federal government under 11 which the federal government specifies the recipient or recipients or 12 type or types or nature of such legal services. 13 § 3. The judiciary law is amended by adding a new section 484-a to 14 read as follows: 15 § 484-a. Compulsory legal services prohibited. No law firm employer in 16 the state of New York may require an employee to assist in the provision 17 of legal services provided pursuant to an agreement between the law firm 18 and the federal government under which the federal government specifies 19 the recipient or recipients or type or types or nature of such legal 20 services. 21 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 22 it shall have become a law and shall expire and be deemed repealed Janu- 23 ary 20, 2029. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 24 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 25 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 26 on or before such effective date.